Massachusetts, session 194th, H1348.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
“An Act to establish the Massachusetts loan loss guarantee program for community
development financial institutions” establishes a loan loss guarantee program for community
development financial institutions and nonprofit and non-traditional lenders, including an
advisory board of stakeholders including Amplify LatinX, The Boston Foundation, Black
Economic Council of Massachusetts (BECMA), Coalition for an Equitable Economy (CEE), and
the Massachusetts Association of Community Development Corporations (MACDC).
Bill Text
SECTION 1. Chapter 23G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 50: Establishing the CDFI loan loss guarantee program
of 4

Section 50. (a) There shall be established within the agency the Massachusetts loan loss
guarantee program for community development financial institutions and other nonprofit and
non-traditional lenders.
(b) The agency, in partnership with the executive office of economic development, shall
establish and administer the Massachusetts Loan Loss Guarantee Program.
(c) The liabilities and obligations of the program shall not extend beyond the monies
which are held by the agency and shall not constitute a debt or pledge of the faith and credit of
the commonwealth or any political subdivision of the commonwealth.
(c) The program shall:
(i) Provide guarantees covering up to 80% of eligible loan losses incurred by CDFIs;
(ii) Prioritize loans that serve microbusinesses and small businesses that serve low-
income communities, Gateway Cities, minority-owned businesses, worker-owned businesses,
women-owned businesses, and socially or economically disadvantaged enterprises; and
(iiI) Include technical assistance and training for participating CDFIs to improve risk
management and lending practices.
(d) The program shall be supported through:
(i) Relevant appropriations;
(ii) fees assessed on community development financial institutions for guarantee services;
(iii) Contributions from private individuals and entities, philanthropic organizations, and
federal funding opportunities;
of 4

(iv) Subventions, grants, loans, advances and contributions from any source of money,
property, labor or other things of value to be held, used and applied in furtherance of this section;
(v) Income earned through equity investments, fees, interest, and other income earned by
the agency and its divisions; and
(vi) uspent revenue held by the Transformative Development Fund, growth capital
division, or other sources identified by the agency or the executive office of economic
development.
(e) To administer the program, the agency shall:
(i) Develop criteria for loan eligibility, guarantee terms, and risk-sharing arrangements;
(ii) Monitor the financial performance of loans guaranteed under the Program; and
(ii) Submit annual reports to the General Court, detailing the Program’s impact, financial
performance, and recommended improvements within 90 days of the end of the fiscal year.
(f) The agency, in collaboration with the executive office of economic development, shall
convene an advisory board comprising representatives from three leaders of community
development financial institutions, three leaders of other nonprofit or non-traditional lending
institutions, two leaders of national banks, two leaders of state-chartered banks, two leaders of
credit unions, the executive director of the Coalition for an Equitable Economy or their designee,
the executive director of the Massachusetts Association of Community Development
Corporations or their designee, the executive director of the Black Economic Council of
Massachusetts or their designee, the executive director of The Boston Foundation or their
designee, the director of the growth capital division or their designee, the director of the
of 4

transformational development initiative or their designee, the commissioner of banks or their
designee, and the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on financial services or their
designee.
(i) The secretary of economic development shall serve as chair and the executive director
of the agency shall serve as vice chair.
(ii) The advisory board may vote to appoint additional ex officio members.
(iii) Any advisory board member may appoint a designee to serve in their place.
of 4